California statutes. Business and Professions Code
A violation of this chapter is an infraction punishable by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) for the first offense, and a fine of not less than five hundred dollars ($500) for each subsequent offense.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 433, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

22519.5.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to limit the effect of any other state law or any local ordinance governing money exchange house permit applications, permit denials, permit renewals, permit revocations, regulatory fees, regulations on advertising or signs, receipt requirements, or penalties for violations thereof.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 22520 (as added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 433) by Stats. 1990, Ch. 216, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 22. Internet Privacy Requirements [22575. - 22579.]

22575.

(a) An operator of a commercial Web site or online service that collects personally identifiable information through the Internet about individual consumers residing in California who use or visit its commercial Web site or online service shall conspicuously post its privacy policy on its Web site, or in the case of an operator of an online service, make that policy available in accordance with paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) of Section 22577. An operator shall be in violation of this subdivision only if the operator fails to post its policy within 30 days after being notified of noncompliance.

(b) The privacy policy required by subdivision (a) shall do
 all of the following:

(1) Identify the categories of personally identifiable information that the operator collects through the Web site or online service about individual consumers who use or visit its commercial Web site or online service and the categories of third-party persons or entities with whom the operator may share that personally identifiable information.

(2) If the operator maintains a process for an individual consumer who uses or visits its commercial Web site or online service to review and request changes to any of his or her personally identifiable information that is collected through the Web site or online service, provide a description of that process.

(3) Describe the process by which the
 operator notifies consumers who use or visit its commercial Web site or online service of material changes to the operator’s privacy policy for that Web site or online service.

(4) Identify its effective date.

(5) Disclose how the operator responds to Web browser “do not track” signals or other mechanisms that provide consumers the ability to exercise choice regarding
 the collection of personally identifiable information about an individual consumer’s online activities over time and across third-party Web sites or online services, if the operator engages in that collection.

(6) Disclose whether other parties
 may collect personally identifiable information about an individual consumer’s online activities over time and across different Web sites when a consumer uses the operator’s Web site or service.

(7) An operator may satisfy the requirement of paragraph (5) by providing a clear and conspicuous hyperlink in the operator’s privacy policy to an online location containing a description, including the effects, of any program or protocol the operator follows that offers the consumer that choice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 390, Sec. 1.   (AB 370)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

22576.

An operator of a commercial Web site or online service that collects personally identifiable information through the Web site or online service from individual consumers who use or visit the commercial Web site or online service and who reside in California shall be in violation of this section if the operator fails to comply with the provisions of Section 22575 or with the provisions of its posted privacy policy in either of the following ways:

(a) Knowingly and willfully.

(b) Negligently and materially.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 829, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2004.   Section operative July 1, 2004, pursuant to Section 22579.)
-------------------------------------------

22577.

For the purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:

(a) The term “personally identifiable information” means individually identifiable information about an individual consumer collected online by the operator from that individual and maintained by the operator in an accessible form, including any of the following:

(1) A first and last name.

(2) A home or other physical address, including street name and name of a city or town.

(3) An e-mail address.

(4) A telephone number.

(5) A social security number.

(6) Any other identifier that permits the physical or online contacting of a specific individual.

(7) Information concerning a user that the Web site or online service collects online from the user and maintains in personally identifiable form in combination with an identifier described in this subdivision.

(b) The term “conspicuously post” with respect to a privacy policy shall include posting the privacy policy through any of the following:

(1) A Web page on which the actual privacy policy is posted if the Web page is the homepage or first significant page after entering the Web site.

(2) An icon that hyperlinks to a Web page on which the actual privacy policy is posted, if the icon is located on the homepage or the first significant page after entering the Web site, and if the icon contains the word “privacy.” The icon shall also use a color that contrasts with the background color of the Web page or is otherwise distinguishable.

(3) A text link that hyperlinks to a Web page on which the actual privacy policy is posted, if the text link is located on the homepage or first significant page after entering the Web site, and if the text link does one of the following:

(A) Includes the word “privacy.”

(B) Is written in capital letters equal to or greater in size than the surrounding text.

(C) Is written in larger type than the surrounding text, or in contrasting type, font, or color to the surrounding text of the same size, or set off from the surrounding text of the same size by symbols or other marks that call attention to the language.

(4) Any other functional hyperlink that is so displayed that a reasonable person would notice it.

(5) In the case of an online service, any other reasonably accessible means of making the privacy policy available for consumers of the online service.

(c) The term “operator” means any person or entity that owns a Web site located on the Internet or an online service that collects and maintains personally identifiable information from a consumer residing in California who uses or visits the Web site or online service if the Web site or online service is operated for commercial purposes. It does not include any third party that operates, hosts, or manages, but does not own, a Web site or online service on the owner’s behalf or by processing information on behalf of the owner.

(d) The term “consumer” means any individual who seeks or acquires, by purchase or lease, any goods, services, money, or credit for personal, family, or household purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 829, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2004.   Section operative July 1, 2004, pursuant to Section 22579.)
-------------------------------------------

22578.

It is the intent of the Legislature that this chapter is a matter of statewide concern. This chapter supersedes and preempts all rules, regulations, codes, ordinances, and other laws adopted by a city, county, city and county, municipality, or local agency regarding the posting of a privacy policy on an Internet Web site.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 829, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2004.   Section operative July 1, 2004, pursuant to Section 22579.)
-------------------------------------------

22579.

This chapter shall become operative on July 1, 2004.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 829, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2004.   Note: This section prescribes a delayed operative date for Chapter 22, commencing with Section 22575.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 22.1. Privacy Rights for California Minors in the Digital World [22580. - 22582.]

22580.

(a) An operator of an Internet Web site, online service, online application, or mobile application directed to minors shall not market or advertise a product or a service described in subdivision (i) on its Internet Web site, online service, online application, or mobile application directed to minors.

(b) An operator of an Internet Web site, online service, online application, or mobile application:

(1) Shall not market or advertise a product or service described in subdivision (i) to a minor who the operator has actual knowledge is using its Internet Web site, online service, online
 application, or mobile application and is a minor, if the marketing or advertising is specifically directed to that minor based upon information specific to that minor, including, but not limited to, the minor’s profile, activity, address, or location sufficient to establish contact with a minor, and excluding Internet Protocol (IP) address and product identification numbers for the operation of a service.

(2) Shall be deemed to be in compliance with paragraph (1) if the operator takes reasonable actions in good faith designed to avoid marketing or advertising under circumstances prohibited under paragraph (1).

(c) An operator of an Internet Web site, online service, online application, or mobile application directed to minors or who has actual knowledge that a minor is using its Internet Web site, online service, online application, or mobile application, shall not knowingly use,
 disclose, compile, or allow a third party to use, disclose, or compile, the personal information of a minor with actual knowledge that the use, disclosure, or compilation is for the purpose of marketing or advertising products or services to that minor for a product described in subdivision (i).

(d) “Minor” means a natural person under 18 years of age who resides in this state.

(e) “Internet Web site, online service, online application, or mobile application directed to minors” mean an Internet Web site, online service, online application, or mobile application, or a portion thereof, that is created for the purpose of reaching an audience that is predominately comprised of minors, and is
 not intended for a more general audience comprised of adults. Provided, however, that an Internet Web site, online service, online application, or mobile application, or a portion thereof, shall not be deemed to be directed at minors solely because it refers or links to an Internet Web site, online service, online application, or mobile application directed to minors by using information location tools, including a directory, index, reference, pointer, or hypertext link.

(f) “Operator” means any person or entity that owns an Internet Web site, online service, online application, or mobile application. It does not include any third party that operates, hosts, or manages, but does not own, an Internet Web site, online service, online application, or mobile application on the owner’s behalf or processes information on the owner’s behalf.

(g) This section shall not be construed to
 require an operator of an Internet Web site, online service, online application, or mobile application to collect or retain age information about users.

(h) (1) With respect to marketing or advertising provided by an advertising service, the operator of an Internet Web site, online service, online application, or mobile application directed to minors shall be deemed to be in compliance with subdivision (a) if the operator notifies the advertising service, in the manner required by the advertising service, that the site, service, or application is directed to minors.

(2) If an advertising service is notified, in the manner required by the advertising service, that an Internet Web site, online service, online application, or mobile application is directed to minors pursuant to paragraph (1), the advertising service shall not market or advertise a product or
 service on the operator’s Internet Web site, online service, online application, or mobile application that is described in subdivision (i).

(i) The marketing and advertising restrictions described in subdivisions (a) and (b) shall apply to the following products and services as they are defined under state law:

(1) Alcoholic beverages, as referenced in Sections 23003 to 23007, inclusive, and Section 25658.

(2) Firearms or handguns, as referenced in Sections 16520, 16640, and 27505 of the Penal Code.

(3) Ammunition or reloaded ammunition, as referenced in
 Sections 16150 and 30300 of the Penal Code.

(4) Handgun safety certificates, as referenced in Sections 31625 and 31655 of the Penal Code.

(5) Aerosol container of paint that is capable of defacing property, as referenced in Section 594.1 of the Penal Code.

(6) Etching cream that is capable of defacing property, as referenced in Section 594.1 of the Penal Code.

(7) Any tobacco, cigarette, or cigarette papers, or blunt wraps, or any other preparation of tobacco, or any other instrument or paraphernalia that is designed for the smoking or ingestion of tobacco, products prepared from tobacco, or any controlled substance, as referenced in Division 8.5 (commencing with Section 22950) and Sections 308, 308.1, 308.2, and 308.3 of the Penal Code.

(8) Notwithstanding subdivision (b) of Section 26151, any cannabis, cannabis product, cannabis business, or any instrument or paraphernalia that is designed for the smoking or ingestion of cannabis or cannabis products. 

(9) BB device, as referenced in Sections 16250 and 19910 of the Penal Code.

(10) Dangerous fireworks, as referenced in Sections 12505 and 12689 of the Health and Safety Code.

(11) Tanning in an ultraviolet tanning device, as referenced in Sections 22702 and 22706.

(12) Dietary supplement products containing ephedrine group alkaloids, as referenced in Section 110423.2 of the Health and Safety
 Code.

(13) Tickets or shares in a lottery game, as referenced in Sections 8880.12 and 8880.52 of the Government Code.

(14) Salvia divinorum or Salvinorin A, or any substance or material containing Salvia divinorum or Salvinorin A, as referenced in Section 379 of the Penal Code.

(15) Body branding, as referenced in Sections 119301 and 119302 of the Health and Safety Code.

(16) Permanent tattoo, as referenced in Sections 119301 and 119302 of the Health and Safety Code and Section 653 of the Penal Code.

(17) Drug paraphernalia, as referenced in Section 11364.5 of the Health and Safety Code.

(18) Electronic cigarette, as referenced in Section 119406 of the Health and Safety Code.

(19) Obscene matter, as referenced in Section 311 of the Penal Code.

(20) A less lethal weapon, as referenced in Sections 16780 and 19405 of the Penal Code.

(j) The marketing and advertising restrictions described in subdivisions (a), (b), and (c) shall not apply to the incidental placement of products or services embedded in content if the content is not distributed by or at the direction of the operator primarily for the purposes of marketing and advertising of the products or services described in subdivision (i).

(k) “Marketing or advertising” means, in exchange for monetary compensation, to make a communication to one or more individuals, or to arrange for the dissemination to the public of a communication, about a product or service the primary purpose of which is to encourage recipients of the communication to purchase or use the product or service.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 347, Sec. 1.   (AB 3067)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

22581.

(a) An operator of an Internet Web site, online service, online application, or mobile application directed to minors or an operator of an Internet Web site, online service, online application, or mobile application that has actual knowledge that a minor is using its Internet Web site, online service, online application, or mobile application shall do all of the following:

(1) Permit a minor who is a registered user of the operator’s Internet Web site, online service, online application, or mobile application to remove or, if the operator prefers, to request and obtain removal of, content or information posted on the operator’s Internet Web site, online service, online
 application, or mobile application by the user.

(2) Provide notice to a minor who is a registered user of the operator’s Internet Web site, online service, online application, or
 mobile application that the minor may remove or, if the operator prefers, request and obtain removal of, content or information posted on the operator’s Internet Web site, online service, online application, or mobile application by the registered user.

(3) Provide clear instructions to a minor who is a registered user of the operator’s Internet Web site, online service, online application, or mobile application on how the user may remove or, if the operator prefers, request and obtain the removal of content or information posted on the operator’s Internet Web site, online service, online application, or mobile application.

(4) Provide notice to a minor who is a registered user of the operator’s Internet Web site, online service, online application, or
 mobile application that the removal described under paragraph (1) does not ensure complete or comprehensive removal of the content or information posted on the operator’s Internet Web site, online service, online application, or mobile application by the registered user.

(b) An operator or a third party is not required to erase or otherwise eliminate, or to enable erasure or elimination of, content or information in any of the following circumstances:

(1) Any other provision of federal or state law requires the operator or third party to maintain the content or information.

(2) The content or information was stored on or
 posted to the operator’s Internet Web site, online service, online application, or mobile application by a third party other than the minor, who is a registered user, including any content or information posted by the registered user that was stored, republished, or reposted by the third party.

(3) The operator anonymizes the content or information posted by the minor who is a registered user, so that the minor who is a registered user cannot be individually identified.

(4) The minor does not follow the instructions provided to the minor pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision
 (a) on how the registered user may request and obtain the removal of content or information posted on the operator’s Internet Web site, online service, online application, or mobile application by the registered user.

(5) The minor has received compensation or other consideration for providing the content.

(c) This section shall not be construed to limit the authority of a law enforcement agency to obtain any content or information from an operator as authorized by law or pursuant to an order of a court of competent jurisdiction.

(d) An operator shall be deemed compliant with this section if:

(1) It renders the content or information posted by the minor user
 no longer visible to other users of the service and the public even if the content or information remains on the operator’s servers in some form.

(2) Despite making the original posting by the minor user invisible, it remains visible because a third party has copied the posting or reposted the content or information posted by the minor.

(e) This section shall not be construed to require an operator of an Internet Web site, online service, online application, or mobile application to collect age information about users.

(f) “Posted” means content or information that can be accessed by a user in addition to the minor who posted the content or
 information, whether the user is a registered user or not, of the Internet Web site, online service, online application, or mobile application where the content or information is posted.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 336, Sec. 1.   (SB 568)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Section operative January 1, 2015, pursuant to Section 22582.)
-------------------------------------------

22582.

This chapter shall become operative on January 1, 2015.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 336, Sec. 1.   (SB 568)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Note: This section prescribes a delayed operative date for Chapter 22.1, commencing with Section 22580.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 22.2. K–12 Pupil Online Personal Information Protection Act [22584. - 22585.]

22584.

(a) For purposes of this chapter:

(1) “California Consumer Privacy Act-excluded covered information” or “CCPA-excluded covered information” means covered information that is not subject to the California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018 (Title 1.81.5 (commencing with Section 1798.100) of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code).

(2) “Covered information” means personally identifiable information or materials, in any media or format that meets any of the following:

(A) Is created or
 provided by a pupil, or the pupil’s parent or legal guardian, to an operator in the course of the pupil’s, parent’s, or legal guardian’s use of the operator’s site, service, or application for K–12 school purposes.

(B) Is created or provided by an employee or agent of the school or local educational agency to an operator.

(C) Is gathered by an operator through the operation of a site, service, or application described in paragraph (6) and is descriptive of a pupil or otherwise identifies a pupil, including, but not limited to, information in the pupil’s educational record or email, first and last name, home address, telephone number, email address, or other information that allows physical or online contact, discipline records, test results, special education data, juvenile dependency
 records, grades, evaluations, criminal records, medical records, health records, social security number, biometric information, disabilities, socioeconomic information, food purchases, political affiliations, religious information, text messages, documents, pupil identifiers, search activity, photographs, voice recordings, or geolocation information.

(3) “K–12 school purposes” means purposes that customarily take place at the direction of the K–12 school, teacher, or local educational agency or aid in the administration of school activities, including, but not limited to, instruction in the classroom or at home, administrative activities, and collaboration between pupils, school personnel, or parents, or are for the use and benefit of the school.

(4) “Local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, charter school, or the state special schools for the blind and the deaf.

(5) “National assessment provider” means a person that develops, sponsors, or administers standardized tests.

(6) “Online service” includes cloud computing services, which must comply with this section if they otherwise meet the definition of an operator.

(7) “Operator” means the operator of an internet website, online service, online application, or mobile application with actual knowledge that the site, service, or application is used primarily for K–12 school purposes and was designed and marketed for K–12 school purposes.

(8) “Pupil” means a student enrolled in a K–12 course of instruction.

(9) “Standardized test” means a test administered in California at the expense of the test subject that meets either of the following criteria:

(A) The test is used for the purposes of admission to, or class placement in, postsecondary educational institutions or their programs.

(B) The test is used for preliminary preparation for a test described in subparagraph (A).

(b) An operator shall not knowingly engage in any of the following activities with respect to their site, service, or application:

(1) (A) Engage in targeted advertising on the operator’s site, service, or application, or (B) target advertising on any
 other site, service, or application when the targeting of the advertising is based upon any information, including covered information and persistent unique identifiers, that the operator has acquired because of the use of that operator’s site, service, or application described in paragraph (6) of subdivision (a).

(2) Use information, including persistent unique identifiers, created or gathered by the operator’s site, service, or application, to amass a profile about a pupil enrolled in a local educational agency, except in furtherance of K–12 school purposes.

(3) Sell a pupil’s information, including covered information. This prohibition does not apply to the purchase, merger, or other type of acquisition of an operator by another entity, provided that the operator or
 successor entity continues to be subject to the provisions of this section with respect to previously acquired pupil information.

(4) Disclose covered information unless the disclosure is made:

(A) In furtherance of the K–12 purpose of the site, service, or application, provided the recipient of the covered information disclosed pursuant to this subparagraph:

(i) Shall not further disclose the information unless done to allow or improve operability and functionality within that pupil’s classroom or school; and

(ii) Is legally required to comply with subdivision (d);

(B) To ensure legal and regulatory
 compliance;

(C) To respond to or participate in judicial process;

(D) To protect the safety of users or others or security of the site; or

(E) To a service provider, provided the operator contractually (i) prohibits the service provider from using any covered information for any purpose other than providing the contracted service to, or on behalf of, the operator, (ii) prohibits the service provider from disclosing any covered information provided by the operator with subsequent third parties, and (iii) requires the service
 provider to implement and maintain reasonable security procedures and practices as provided in subdivision (d).

(c) Subdivision (b) does not prohibit the operator’s use of information for maintaining, developing, supporting, improving, or diagnosing the operator’s site, service, or application.

(d) An operator shall do all of the following:

(1) Implement and maintain reasonable security procedures and practices appropriate to the nature of the covered information, and protect that information from unauthorized access, destruction, use, modification, or disclosure.

(2) (A) Delete a pupil’s covered information if the school or local educational agency requests deletion of data under the control of the school or local educational agency.

(B) This paragraph does not require the deletion of pupil records held by a national assessment provider and that only include standardized test results.

(3) (A) Delete a pupil’s CCPA-excluded covered information under the operator’s control if a pupil’s parent or
 guardian or, in the case of a
 former pupil who is 18 years of age or older, the pupil requests an operator to delete the covered information under the operator’s control if the pupil
 has been no longer enrolled in the local educational
 agency for at least 60 days.

(B) Before deleting any information described in subparagraph (A), the operator shall require documentation that the pupil is no longer enrolled in the local educational agency.

(C) This paragraph does not require deletion of mandatory permanent pupil records, described in Section 430 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations, or any official records or files directly related to a pupil and maintained by the
 operator, school, or local educational agency, including, but not limited to, records of achievement and results of evaluative tests or records encompassing all the material kept in the pupil’s cumulative folder that is maintained by the school or local educational agency, including, but not limited to, general identifying data, records of attendance and of academic work completed, health data, disciplinary status, test protocols, individualized education
 programs, or pupil records held by a national assessment provider and that only include standardized test results.

(e) Notwithstanding paragraph (4) of subdivision (b), an operator may disclose covered information of a pupil, as long as paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, of subdivision (b) are not violated, under the following circumstances:

(1) If other provisions of federal or state law require the operator to disclose the information, and the operator complies with the requirements of federal and state law in protecting and disclosing that information.

(2) For legitimate research purposes: (A) as required by state or federal law and subject to the restrictions under applicable state and
 federal law or (B) as allowed by state or federal law and under the direction of a local educational agency or state department of education, if no covered information is used for any purpose in furtherance of advertising or to amass a profile on the pupil for purposes other than K–12 school purposes.

(3) To a state or local educational agency, including schools of local educational agencies, for K–12 school purposes, as permitted by state or federal law.

(f) This section does not prohibit an operator from using deidentified pupil covered information as follows:

(1) Within the operator’s site, service, or application or other sites, services, or applications owned by the operator to improve educational products.

(2) To demonstrate the effectiveness of the operator’s products or services, including in their marketing.

(g) This section does not prohibit an operator from sharing aggregated deidentified pupil covered information for the development and improvement of educational sites, services, or applications.

(h) This section does not limit the authority of a law enforcement agency to obtain any content or information from an operator as authorized by law or pursuant to an order of a court of competent jurisdiction.

(i) This section does not limit the ability of an operator to use pupil data, including covered information, for adaptive learning or customized pupil
 learning purposes.

(j) This section does not apply to general audience internet websites, general audience online services, general audience online applications, or general audience mobile applications, even if login credentials created for an operator’s site, service, or application may be used to access those general audience sites, services, or applications.

(k) This section does not limit internet service providers from providing internet connectivity to schools or pupils and their families.

(l) This section does not prohibit an operator of an internet website, online service, online application, or mobile application from marketing educational products directly to parents so long as the marketing did
 not result from the use of covered information obtained by the operator through the provision of services covered under this section.

(m) This section does not impose a duty upon a provider of an electronic store, gateway, marketplace, or other means of purchasing or downloading software or applications to review or enforce compliance of this section on those applications or software.

(n) This section does not impose a duty upon a provider of an interactive computer service, as defined in Section 230 of Title 47 of the United States Code, to review or enforce compliance with this section by third-party content providers.

(o) This section does not impede the ability of pupils to download, export, or otherwise
 save or maintain their own pupil-created data or documents.

(p) This section shall not be interpreted to limit or supersede any rights or requirements under the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.), the Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 701 et seq.), and any rules or regulations promulgated pursuant to those laws.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 935, Sec. 2.   (AB 801)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

22585.

This chapter shall become operative on January 1, 2016.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 839, Sec. 1.   (SB 1177)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Section operative January 1, 2016, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 22.2.3. National Assessment Providers [22585.5. - 22585.6.]

22585.5.

For purposes of this chapter:

(a) “Covered information” means personal information provided by an individual, or the individual’s parent or legal guardian, to a national assessment provider for the purposes of administering, or publishing or distributing the scores with respect to, a standardized test.

(b) “National assessment provider” means a person that develops, sponsors, or administers standardized tests.

(c) “Personal information” has the same meaning as defined in Section 1798.140 of the Civil Code.

(d) (1) “Standardized test” means a test
 administered in California at the expense of the test subject that meets either of the following criteria:

(A) The test is used for the purposes of admission to, or class placement in, postsecondary educational institutions or their programs.

(B) The test is used for preliminary preparation for a test described in subparagraph (A).

(2) “Standardized test” does not mean a test administered for K–12 purposes, as defined in Section 22584.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 508, Sec. 1.   (AB 1971)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

22585.6.

(a) A national assessment provider shall not knowingly do any of the following with respect to its administration of, or publishing or distributing the scores with respect to, a standardized test:

(1) (A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B), sell covered information.

(B) A national assessment provider may sell covered information if either of the following apply:

(i) The sale is incident to the purchase, merger, or other type of acquisition of a national assessment provider by another entity, if that entity complies with this chapter as if it were a national assessment provider.

(ii) (I) The sale is to colleges, universities, financial aid and scholarship agencies, government agencies, and organizations that offer educational, community involvement, extracurricular, and career opportunities products and services solely to provide access to employment, educational scholarships or financial aid, or educational opportunities.

(II) This clause applies only if the individual, or the individual’s parent or legal guardian, identified by the covered information expressly consented to the sale of the covered information.

(2) Disclose covered information to a third party, including, but not limited to, social media providers through cookies, pixels, or similar tracking technologies on the national assessment provider’s internet website.

(3) Disclose covered information unless any of the following is true:

(A) (i) The disclosure is made in furtherance of the purposes of the standardized test, including, but not limited to, disclosure to postsecondary institutions, scholarship providers, or government agencies for the purpose of an individual’s admission, course credit, or placement in an institution or facilitating an individual’s eligibility for recognition, a scholarship, or financial aid.

(ii) This subparagraph applies only if the individual identified by the covered information expressly consented to the disclosure, and the recipient of the covered information agreed not to further disclose the information without the consent of the individual or as required by law.

(B) The disclosure is made to ensure legal and regulatory compliance.

(C) The disclosure is made to respond to, or participate in, judicial process.

(D) The disclosure is made to protect personal safety or the safety of others.

(E) The disclosure is made to a service provider if a national assessment provider contractually does all of the following:

(i) Prohibits the service provider from using any covered information for a purpose other than providing the contracted service to, or on behalf of, the national assessment provider.

(ii) Prohibits the service provider from disclosing any covered information provided by the national assessment provider to other third parties.

(iii) Requires the service provider to implement and maintain reasonable security procedures and practices appropriate to the nature of the covered information, and protect that information from unauthorized access, destruction, use, modification, or disclosure.

(F) The disclosure is made for legitimate research purposes required by state or federal law.

(G) The disclosure is made to a state or local educational agency, including a school or school district.

(H) The disclosure is made to a parent or legal guardian of the individual identified by the covered information if that individual is under the age of 18.

(b) This section does not prohibit a national assessment provider from using
 covered information for maintaining, developing, supporting, improving, or diagnosing the national assessment provider’s programs and services.

(c) A national assessment provider shall implement and maintain reasonable security procedures and practices appropriate to the nature of the covered information, and protect that information from unauthorized access, destruction, use, modification, or disclosure.

(d) If there is a conflict between any other law, including the California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018 (Title 1.81.5 (commencing with Section 1798.100) of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code) and this chapter, the law that affords the greatest protection of the right of privacy shall control.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 508, Sec. 1.   (AB 1971)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 22.2.5. Early Learning Personal Information Protection Act [22586. - 22587.]

22586.

(a) For purposes of this chapter:

(1) “California Consumer Privacy Act-excluded covered information” or “CCPA-excluded covered information” means covered information that is not subject to the California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018 (Title 1.81.5 (commencing with Section 1798.100) of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code).

(2) “Covered information” means personally identifiable information or materials, in any media or format that meets any of the following:

(A) Is created or provided by a pupil, or the pupil’s parent or legal guardian, to an operator in the
 course of the pupil’s, parent’s, or legal guardian’s use of the operator’s site, service, or application for preschool and prekindergarten purposes.

(B) Is created or provided by an employee or agent of the preschool, prekindergarten, school district, local educational agency, or county office of education, to an operator.

(C) Is gathered by an operator through the operation of a site, service, or application described in paragraph (4), and is descriptive of a pupil or otherwise identifies a pupil, including, but not limited to, information in the pupil’s educational record or email, first and last name, home address, telephone number, email address, or other information that allows physical or online contact, discipline records, test results, special education data, juvenile dependency